District of Columbia statutes.
29-1206.08

Beneficial owner’s right to information.

A beneficial owner shall have the right to receive from the statutory trust or a trustee information relating to the affairs of a statutory trust which is reasonably related to the beneficial owner’s interest. The beneficial owner may enforce this right by summary proceeding in the Superior Court.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-1201.04 and § 29-1206.14.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 608 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.

Editor's Notes